el: Τύπος παράκαμψης ήχου: Παράκαμψη με buffer; Παράκαμψη DSP; Παράκαμψη σκληρής καλωδίωσης; Καμία; Παράκαμψη ρελέ; Εναλλάξιμη παράκαμψη; Πραγματική παράκαμψη; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta audio zaobilaženja: Međupohranjena premosnica; DSP premosnica; Fizička premosnica; Nema; Relejska premosnica; Preklopna premosnica; Prava premosnica; Ostalo
tr: Ses bypass tipi: Tamponlanmış bypass; DSP bypass; Donanımsal bypass; Hiçbiri; Röle bypass; Anahtarlanabilir bypass; Gerçek bypass; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de bypass de áudio: Bypass com buffer; Bypass DSP; Bypass por fio direto; Nenhum; Bypass por relé; Bypass comutável; True bypass; Outro
en: Audio bypass type: Buffered bypass; DSP bypass; Hard-wire bypass; None; Relay bypass; Switchable bypass; True bypass; Other
ja: オーディオバイパスタイプ: バッファードバイパス; DSP バイパス; ハードワイヤーバイパス; なし; リレーバイパス; スイッチャブルバイパス; トゥルーバイパス; その他
es: Tipo de bypass de audio: Bypass con buffer; Bypass DSP; Bypass de cableado directo; Ninguno; Bypass de relé; Bypass conmutable; True bypass; Otros
ru: Тип обхода аудиосигнала: Буферизованный обход; DSP-обход; Жесткий обход; Нет; Релейный обход; Переключаемый обход; Истинный обход; Другой
zh-CN: 音频旁路类型: 缓冲旁路; DSP 旁路; 硬线旁路; 无; 继电器旁路; 可切换旁路; 真旁路; 其他
it: Tipo di bypass audio: Bypass bufferizzato; Bypass DSP; Bypass cablato; Nessuna; Bypass a relè; Bypass commutabile; True bypass; Altro
da: Lyd-bypass-type: Bufferet bypass; DSP bypass; Hardwire bypass; Ingen; Relæ bypass; Omskiftelig bypass; Ægte bypass; Andet
ro-RO: Tip bypass audio: Bypass cu buffer; Bypass DSP; Bypass cu fir direct; Niciuna; Bypass cu releu; Bypass comutabil; True bypass; Altele
th: ประเภทบายพาสเสียง: บัฟเฟอร์บายพาส; DSP บายพาส; ฮาร์ดไวร์บายพาส; ไม่มี; รีเลย์บายพาส; บายพาสแบบสวิตช์ได้; ทรูบายพาส; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de contournement audio: Bypass tamponné; Bypass DSP; Bypass câblé; Aucune; Bypass par relais; Bypass commutable; True bypass; Autre
hu: Audio bypass-típus: Pufferelt bypass; DSP bypass; Keményhuzalos bypass; Egyik sem; Relé bypass; Kapcsolható bypass; Valódi bypass; Egyéb
vi: Loại bypass âm thanh: Bypass đệm; Bypass DSP; Bypass cứng; Không có; Bypass rơle; Bypass chuyển đổi; Bypass thực; Khác
bg-BG: Тип байпас на аудиосигнала: Буфериран байпас; DSP байпас; Директен байпас; Няма; Релеен байпас; Превключваем байпас; Истински байпас; Други
sk-SK: Typ premostenia zvuku: Bufferovaný bypass; DSP bypass; Pevné prepojenie bypass; Žiadny; Reléový bypass; Prepínateľný bypass; Skutočný bypass; Iné
pl: Typ obejścia sygnału audio: Buforowany bypass; Bypass DSP; Bypass przewodowy; Brak; Bypass przekaźnikowy; Bypass przełączany; True bypass; Inne
nl: Audio bypass type: Gebufferde bypass; DSP bypass; Hard-wire bypass; Geen; Relais bypass; Schakelbare bypass; True bypass; Andere
zh-TW: 音訊旁路類型: 緩衝旁路; DSP 旁路; 硬線旁路; 無; 繼電器旁路; 可切換旁路; 真旁路; 其他
fi: Äänen ohituksen tyyppi: Puskuroitu ohitus; DSP-ohitus; Kiinteä ohitus; Ei mitään; Rele-ohitus; Vaihdettava ohitus; Aito ohitus; Muu
ko: 오디오 바이패스 유형: 버퍼드 바이패스; DSP 바이패스; 하드와이어 바이패스; 없음; 릴레이 바이패스; 전환식 바이패스; 트루 바이패스; 기타
lt-LT: Garso apėjimo tipas: Buferinis apėjimas; DSP apėjimas; Kietasis apėjimas; Nėra; Relinis apėjimas; Perjungiamas apėjimas; Tikrasis apėjimas; Kita
cs: Typ audio bypassu: Bufferovaný bypass; DSP bypass; Přímé propojení bypass; Žádný; Reléový bypass; Přepínatelný bypass; True bypass; Jiné
sv: Ljudförbikopplingstyp: Buffrad bypass; DSP-bypass; Hårdkopplad bypass; Inga; Reläbypass; Omkopplingsbar bypass; True bypass; Övrigt
nb: Lyd bypass type: Bufret bypass; DSP bypass; Hardwire bypass; Ingen; Relé bypass; Omkoblingsbar bypass; True bypass; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de bypass de áudio: Bypass com buffer; Bypass DSP; Bypass direto; Nenhum; Bypass por relé; Bypass comutável; True bypass; Outro
sl-SI: Tip avdio obvoda: Blažilni obvod; DSP obvod; Trdi žični obvod; Brez; Relejev obvod; Preklopni obvod; Pravi obvod; Drugo
de: Steuerungsschnittstelle: Gepufferter Bypass; DSP-Bypass; Direktverdrahteter Bypass; Keine; Relais-Bypass; Schaltbarer Bypass; True Bypass; Sonstiges